North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-15 Revised Uniform Adoption Act
14-15-16.
Hearings and records in adoption proceedings — Confidential nature — Disclosure of identifying and nonidentifying information — Retroactive operation.

The provisions of this section supersede any other law regarding public hearings and records.

For purposes of this section:

“Genetic parent” includes a man presumed or adjudicated to be the adopted individual’s father under chapter 14-20 and an alleged father when so indicated in the files of the child-placing agency or the department, but only if there exists in those files information that corroborates the allegation of paternity, including the existence of communications between the alleged father and the child-placing agency, or between the alleged father and the genetic mother or members of her family, or such other corroborative information as may be permitted by rules adopted by the department.

“Notify” means to make a personal and confidential contact with the individual to whom a disclosure of identifying information has been requested. The personal and confidential contact must be made by an employee or agent of the child-placing agency that processed the adoption or by some other licensed child-placing agency designated by the individual initiating the search.

All hearings held in actions under this chapter must be held in closed court without admittance of any individual other than essential officers of the court, the parties, their witnesses, counsel, individuals who have not previously consented to the adoption but are required to consent, the parents of an adult to be adopted, and representatives of the agencies present to perform their official duties. Upon a showing of good cause by the petitioner, the court may prohibit the parents of an adult to be adopted from attending the adoption hearings and proceedings. A parent of an adult to be adopted who is prohibited by the court from attending the proceedings may submit relevant testimony or information regarding the petition to the court in writing.

All papers; records; and identifying and nonidentifying information relating to an adopted individual, birth siblings, birth parents, or adoptive parents, whether part of the permanent record of the court or of a file in the department or in an agency are confidential and may be disclosed only in accordance with this section. Papers, records, and information directly pertaining to the adoption must be kept permanently by the department and agency.

Nonidentifying information, if known, concerning undisclosed genetic parents must be furnished at a reasonable fee to:

The adoptive parents at the time of adoptive placement or upon their written request;

An adopted adult upon written request; or

A birth parent upon written request.

The clerk of the appropriate district court, upon request and payment of the proper fee, shall furnish a certified copy of the decree of adoption to the adoptive parents, the guardian of an adopted minor child, or an adopted adult, provided the decree does not disclose the identity of the genetic parents or the name of the adopted individual before the adoption action.

Before the child reaches adulthood, at the discretion of the child-placing agency, with due regard for confidentiality exchanges of identifying or nonidentifying information may take place between the genetic parents, adoptive parents, and adopted child.

Disclosure of a party’s identifying information may not occur unless the party consents to disclosure.

If one parent objects, the identifying information disclosed by the agency may only relate to the consenting parent or parents.

An adopted individual who is eighteen years of age or older may request the department to initiate the disclosure of information identifying the adopted individual’s genetic parents or to initiate the disclosure of nonidentifying information not on file with the department or a child-placing agency.

An adopted individual who is eighteen years of age or older may request the department to initiate the disclosure of information identifying the adopted individual’s adult genetic sibling.

A genetic parent of an adopted individual, after that individual has reached twenty-one years of age, may request the department to initiate the disclosure of information identifying that individual or to initiate the disclosure of nonidentifying information not on file with the department or a child-placing agency.

An adult genetic sibling of an adopted individual, after that individual has reached twenty-one years of age, may request the department to initiate disclosure of information identifying that individual.

An adult child of a deceased adopted individual may request the department to initiate the disclosure of information identifying the adopted individual’s genetic parents or to initiate the disclosure of nonidentifying information not on file with the department or child-placing agency.

An adult child of an adopted individual who is still living may not request the department to initiate disclosure of information identifying the adopted individual’s genetic parents or to initiate the disclosure of nonidentifying information not on file with the department or child-placing agency.

The department shall, within five working days of receipt of a request under subsection 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, or 13, notify in writing a child-placing agency having access to the requested information. If the department’s records do not identify any child-placing agency having access to the requested information, the department, within five working days after receipt of the request, shall so notify the requester in writing. The requester may designate a child-placing agency from a list of such agencies furnished by the department, ask the department to designate an agency, or terminate the request.

Within ninety days after receiving notice of a request made under subsection 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, or 13, the child-placing agency shall make complete and reasonable efforts to notify the individual or individuals with respect to which a disclosure of identifying information has been requested. The child-placing agency must certify the results of its efforts to the department within one hundred twenty days after receipt of the request. The child-placing agency may charge a reasonable fee to the requester for the cost of making a search pursuant to the request. All communications under this subsection are confidential. If the search is not completed within ninety days, additional time may be requested. Approval of this request must be given by the individual requesting the search.

The personal and confidential contact must be evidenced by an affidavit of notification executed by the individual who notified each genetic parent, adopted individual, or genetic sibling and certifying that each genetic parent, adopted individual, or genetic sibling contacted was given the following information:

The nature of the identifying information to which the agency has access.

The nature of any nonidentifying information requested.

The date of the request of the adopted individual, genetic parent, or genetic sibling.

The right of the genetic parent, adopted individual, or genetic sibling to file, authorize disclosure or refuse to authorize disclosure.

The effect of a failure of the genetic parent, adopted individual, or genetic sibling to either authorize disclosure or refuse to authorize disclosure.

An adopted individual, genetic parent, or genetic sibling, with respect to whom a disclosure of identifying information has been requested, may authorize disclosure, refuse to authorize disclosure, or take no action. If no action is taken in response to a request, the child-placing agency must treat that as a refusal to authorize disclosure, except that it does not preclude disclosure after the individual’s death.

If the child-placing agency has been able to locate only one genetic parent who authorizes disclosure and the other genetic parent cannot be located, the identifying information must be disclosed to the adopted individual. The information disclosed by the agency may relate only to the consenting parent.

If the child-placing agency has located both genetic parents and only one genetic parent authorizes disclosure, the child-placing agency may not disclose identifying information regarding the consenting parties unless there is a court order authorizing the disclosure. Upon application to the court by the child-placing agency, the court shall issue an order authorizing disclosure of information identifying the consenting parties. The order must include any conditions the court determines sufficient to reasonably ensure the continued nondisclosure of information identifying the objecting genetic parent. Conditions placed on the disclosure may include a sworn statement by the consenting genetic parent to refrain from disclosing to the adopted individual any information identifying the objecting genetic parent.

The certification of the child-placing agency to the department must include:

A statement of whether it has been able to notify the individual about whom a disclosure of identifying information was requested and whether a notification was precluded by the death of the individual.

If a genetic sibling was to be notified at the request of an adopted individual, or if an adopted individual was to be notified at the request of a genetic sibling, a statement of whether either individual knows the identity of any mutual genetic parent.

Assurances that:

No disclosure of identifying information has been made with respect to any adopted individual, genetic parent, or genetic sibling who has not authorized the disclosure in writing unless the child-placing agency has verified that the individual has died leaving no unrevoked written refusal to authorize disclosure.

Any disclosure of identifying information that might lawfully be made under this section was made within ten days after the date of receipt of written authorization or the date on which the agency verified that the individual had died.

Copies of any written authorization of disclosure or refusal to authorize disclosure.

A statement that the individual about whom disclosure of identifying information was requested has neither authorized nor refused to authorize disclosure at the time of the certification.

The date of each notification.

A copy of each affidavit of notification.

The child-placing agency, acting on the request of an adopted individual to disclose identifying information about a genetic sibling, or acting on the request of a genetic sibling to disclose identifying information about an adopted individual, must determine if either individual knows the identity of a living mutual genetic parent. If either individual knows the identity of a living mutual genetic parent, no disclosure may be made unless that parent is first notified, in the manner provided for in subsection 13. The identifying information released may only relate to the consenting parties.

Upon application to the department by an adult adopted individual or the parent or guardian of a minor adopted child, the department may investigate or cause to be investigated facts necessary to determine the adopted individual’s eligibility for enrollment as a member of an Indian tribe.

The department may inquire of any individual or agency, including a licensed child-placing agency in North Dakota, to assist in the investigation.

All identifying information obtained by the department shall remain confidential.

The bureau of Indian affairs or an Indian tribe may be provided sufficient information obtained from the investigation to determine the eligibility of the adopted individual for enrollment in an Indian tribe. Before the department’s release of information to the bureau of Indian affairs or an Indian tribe, the department shall request written assurance from the bureau of Indian affairs or an Indian tribe that the information provided will remain confidential and will not be furnished to any unauthorized individual or agency.

The procedure used in contacting the genetic parents of the adopted child must be a personal and confidential contact. Any necessary contact must be made by an employee or agent of a licensed child-placing agency or the department. The information requested of the genetic parents must be limited to that information necessary to make a determination of the adopted individual’s eligibility for enrollment in an Indian tribe.

The department or agency may charge a reasonable fee.

An individual may not be required to disclose the name or identity of either an adoptive parent or an adopted individual except:

In accordance with this section;

As authorized in writing by the adoptive parent or the adopted individual; or

Upon order of the court entered in a proceeding brought under subsection 24.

An adopted individual, a genetic parent, a genetic sibling, or a guardian of any of those individuals may petition the district court for an order directing the disclosure of identifying information.

The petitioner shall state that efforts to secure the requested disclosure have been made under this section or are forbidden under this section, that the petitioner has a significant need for the disclosure, and the nature of that need.

The petition shall name the department and any child-placing agency that has received a request under subsection 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, or 13 as respondents.

The respondents must furnish, to the court, for in camera review, copies of such records as the respondents may possess that contain requested identifying information.

The court may determine if individuals about whom the disclosure of identifying information is requested must be furnished notice of the proceeding and may require that the respondents give notice to those individuals. If those persons participate in the proceeding they must be permitted to do so in a manner, to be determined by the court, which avoids disclosure of identifying information except when disclosure is ordered by the court.

The court may order disclosure only if the petitioner demonstrates that disclosure will not result in any substantial harm to the individual about whom identifying information is sought. The court may not order the disclosure of identifying information concerning any individual who objects to that disclosure.

The provisions of this section governing the release of identifying and nonidentifying adoptive information apply to adoptions completed before and after July 1, 1979.

Any child-placing agency discharging in good faith its responsibilities under this section is immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that otherwise might result.

The department shall make such reasonable rules as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1979, ch. 199, § 2; 1983, ch. 182, § 1; 1989, ch. 182, § 1; 1991, ch. 153, § 1; 1993, ch. 153, § 2; 1993, ch. 154, § 2; 2003, ch. 126, § 16.

Collateral References.

Restricting access to judicial records of pending adoption proceedings, 83 A.L.R.3d 824.

Restricting access to judicial records of concluded adoption proceedings, 103 A.L.R.5th 255.

14-15-17.
Recognition or validation of foreign decree affecting adoption.

A decree of court terminating the relationship of parent and child or establishing the relationship by adoption issued pursuant to due process of law by a court of any other jurisdiction within or outside of the United States must be recognized in this state and the rights and obligations of the parties as to matters within the jurisdiction of this state must be determined as though the decree were issued by a court of this state.

To obtain a validation of a foreign decree of adoption, the adoptive parent shall provide to the court a petition for validation of foreign adoption, an admission stamp in the adopted individual’s passport which indicates that the individual was admitted to the United States with an IH-3 or IR-3 visa, the individual’s foreign birth certificate and English translation, the individual’s foreign adoption decree and English translation, and a signed affidavit from the agency which states that the foreign adoption is valid and which states the name by which the individual is to be known. The petition for validation of foreign adoption must be signed and verified by the petitioner, filed with the clerk of the court, and state:

The date and place of birth of the individual to be adopted, if known;

The name to be used for the individual whose foreign adoption decree is being petitioned for validation;

The date the petitioner acquired custody or the date of placement of the individual and the name of the foreign country’s placing agency;

The full name, age, place, and duration of residence of the petitioner; and

The marital status of the petitioner, including the date and place of marriage, if married.

Upon a finding that the requirements of subdivision a have been met, the court shall issue a decree of validation of foreign adoption. The clerk of court shall forward a copy of the decree of validation of foreign adoption to the registrar of vital statistics for the issuance of a birth record in accordance with section 14-15-18.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 17; 2007, ch. 150, § 1; 2011, ch. 54, § 1.

14-15-18.
Application for new birth record.

Within thirty days after an adoption decree or decree of validation of foreign adoption becomes final, the clerk of the court shall prepare an application for a birth record in the new name of the adopted individual and forward the application to the appropriate vital statistics office of the place, if known, where the adopted individual was born and forward a copy of the decree to the department of this state for statistical purposes. In the case of the adoption of an individual born outside of the United States, the court may make findings, based on evidence from the petitioner and other reliable state or federal sources, on the date and place of birth and parentage of the adopted individual. These findings must be certified by the court and included with the report of adoption filed with the state registrar of vital statistics pursuant to section 23-02.1-17.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1979, ch. 202, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 18; 2007, ch. 150, § 2.

Cross-References.

Addition to birth record in case of adoption, duty of clerk of court, see N.D.C.C. §§ 23-02.1-17, 23-02.1-18.

14-15-19.
Relinquishment and termination of parent and child relationship.

The rights of a parent with reference to a child, including parental right to control the child or to withhold consent to an adoption, may be relinquished and the relationship of parent and child terminated in or before an adoption action as provided in this section.

All rights of a parent with reference to a child, including the right to receive notice of a hearing on a petition for adoption, may be relinquished and the relationship of parent and child terminated by a writing, signed by the parent, regardless of the age of the parent:

In the presence of a representative of an agency taking custody of the child, whether the agency is within or outside of the state or in the presence and with the approval of a judge of a court of record within or outside this state in which the minor was present or in which the parent resided at the time it was signed; or

In any other situation if the petitioner has had custody of the minor for two years, but only if notice of the adoption proceeding has been given to the parent and the court finds, after considering the circumstances of the relinquishment and the long-continued custody by the petitioner, that the best interest of the child requires the granting of the adoption.

In addition to any other action or proceeding provided by law, the relationship of parent and child may be terminated by a court order issued in connection with an adoption action under this chapter on any ground provided by other law for termination of the relationship, and in any event on the ground:

That the minor has been abandoned by the parent;

That by reason of the misconduct, faults, or habits of the parent or the repeated and continuous neglect or refusal of the parent, the minor is without proper parental care and control, or subsistence, education, or other care or control necessary for the minor’s physical, mental, or emotional health or morals, or, by reason of physical or mental incapacity the parent is unable to provide necessary parental care for the minor, and the court finds that the conditions and causes of the behavior, neglect, or incapacity are irremediable or will not be remedied by the parent, and that by reason thereof the minor is suffering or probably will suffer serious physical, mental, moral, or emotional harm; or

That in the case of a parent not having custody of a minor, the noncustodial parent’s consent is being unreasonably withheld contrary to the best interest of the minor.

For the purpose of proceeding under this chapter, a decree terminating all rights of a parent with reference to a child or the relationship of parent and child issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in this or any other state dispenses with the consent to adoption proceedings of a parent whose rights or parent and child relationship are terminated by the decree and with any required notice of an adoption action other than as provided in this section.

A petition for termination of the relationship of parent and child made in connection with an adoption action may be made by:

Either parent if termination of the relationship is sought with respect to the other parent;

The petitioner for adoption, the guardian of the individual, the legal custodian of the child, or the individual standing in parental relationship to the child;

An agency; or

Any other individual having a legitimate interest in the matter.

If the identity of the father or mother is known and an address for service is also known, or the address can be ascertained with reasonable diligence, the father or mother must be personally served the petition and notice for termination of parental rights in compliance with the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

If the identity of the father or mother is unknown but the father’s or mother’s location is known, and the identity of the father or mother cannot be ascertained with reasonable diligence, notice must be given by publication of the petition at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in the official newspaper of the county in which the unknown father or mother is located.

If the identity and location of the father or mother are unknown and the location and identity of the father or mother cannot be ascertained with reasonable diligence, notice must be given by publication of the petition at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in the official newspaper of the county in which conception occurred.

The last publication as required under this subsection must be at least ten days before the time set for hearing. Proof of publication of the notice must be made at or before the hearing and filed in the proceeding.

Before the petition is heard, notice of the hearing on the petition and opportunity to be heard must be given the parents of the child, the guardian of the child, the person having legal custody of the child, any proposed custodian of the child, and, in the discretion of the court, a person representing any party.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2, a relinquishment of parental rights with respect to a child, executed under this section, may be withdrawn by the parent, and a decree of a court terminating the parent and child relationship under this section may be vacated by the court upon motion of the parent, if the child is not on placement for adoption and the person having custody of the child consents in writing to the withdrawal or vacation of the decree.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 19; 2007, ch. 119, § 5; 2017, ch. 121, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

14-15-19.1.
Right to counsel.

A parent who consents to the adoption of a minor, under section 14-15-05, is entitled to legal counsel during all stages of a proceeding to terminate the parent and child relationship under section 14-15-19 if the minor is to be placed for adoption by a child-placing agency licensed under chapter 50-12. The parent may retain counsel of the parent’s own choosing and at the parent’s own expense, or, if indigent, the parent may request the court to order, upon which the court shall order, that a state’s attorney serve as legal counsel to the parent at no cost to the parent. As an alternative to the state’s attorney serving as legal counsel to the parent, the state’s attorney may request the court to order, upon which the court may order, if a conflict is shown to exist, that other legal counsel services that may be available be provided to the parent at no cost to the parent. These alternative legal counsel services include counsel services for indigent persons. Prior to the termination proceeding held under section 14-15-19, the court or a person designated by the court shall inform the parent of the right to counsel provided by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 183, § 1.

14-15-20.
Adoption and legitimation by conduct.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, the biological father of an illegitimate minor adopts and legitimates a minor by publicly acknowledging the minor as that man’s child, receiving the minor into that man’s home, with the consent of that man’s wife, if that man is married, and otherwise treating the minor as if the minor were legitimate. Thereafter, the minor is deemed the legitimate child of the father for all purposes from the time of birth of the minor, the same as if the adoption had been finally decreed pursuant to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 20.

14-15-21.
Application and construction.

This chapter must be so applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among those states which enact it.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1.

14-15-22.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Revised Uniform Adoption Act.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1.

14-15-23.
Effect on pending proceedings.

Any adoption or termination proceeding pending on the effective date of this chapter is not affected thereby.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1.